Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 4 Membership in the Retirement System

47-2-70.
Determination of membership; termination of membership.

After January 1, 1950, any person who becomes an employee of any employer which operates under a merit system of personnel administration and which is covered by the retirement system shall become a member of the retirement system as a condition of his or her employment, except as otherwise specifically excluded.

The membership of any person shall terminate if he or she retires under this retirement system, withdraws his or her contributions, or renders less than one year of service within a period of five consecutive years as a member. No benefit under the retirement system shall accrue to a member’s account while he or she is not in service as an employee and no contribution shall be made to the retirement system by the member, the state, or any other employer during any such time.

The board of trustees may continue the membership of any person while such person is on leave of absence with stipend for professional training when such leave is approved in writing by the employer for which the employee renders service, provided that a member who receives a stipend while on leave for professional training shall make a monthly contribution to the retirement system, which contribution shall be the same basic percentage of his or her salary as an employee as he or she contributed in the last month prior to the effective date of leave. A member shall be considered as being in service while on such leave.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 138, § 3; Ga. L. 1951, p. 394, § 2; Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 349, § 2; Ga. L. 1959, p. 107, § 2; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 7/SB 436.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, inserted “or her” near the end of subsection (a); deleted former subsection (b), which read: “Any person who was an employee during the fiscal year ending June 30, 1949, or who becomes an employee prior to January 1, 1950, shall become a member unless prior to January 1, 1950, he files with the board of trustees, on a form provided by it, a notice of his election not to be included in the membership of the retirement system, together with a duly executed waiver of all present and prospective benefits which would otherwise accrue to him by participating in the retirement system. Such an employee may thereafter apply for and be admitted to membership, but without credit for service rendered after July 1, 1949, and prior to the time he becomes a member and without prior service credit, unless he pays into the retirement system the amount of deductible contributions that would have been paid by such member together with interest on such amount equal to the amount of interest earned by the retirement system at 3 1/2 percent per annum had the amounts been paid in during the period. Upon making such payments, he shall be entitled to all service credits from the year 1949.”; redesignated former subsections (c) and (d) as present subsections (b) and (c), respectively; in present subsection (b), inserted “or she” twice and inserted “or her” in the first sentence; and, in the first sentence of present subsection (c), inserted “or her” and inserted “or she”.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

47-2-70.1.
Employees of new state agencies.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Employee” means full-time officers and employees of a new state agency; provided, however, that such term shall not mean an individual classified by an employer as an independent contractor or a leased employee within the meaning of Section 414(n) of the Internal Revenue Code, even if such individual is later reclassified by the Internal Revenue Service as a common law employee.

“Employer” means a new state agency paying the compensation of an employee.

“New state agency” means any department, division, board, bureau, commission, institution, or other agency of the state or any state public authority which first becomes established or active on or after July 1, 1992.

“State public authority” means any public authority or public corporation created by general law to carry out state purposes or functions, and the term does not include public authorities created by general law to carry out purposes or functions within or on behalf of counties, municipalities, or other political subdivisions and which are activated by action of individual political subdivisions.

Except as otherwise provided by subsection (c) of this Code section, the employees of a new state agency shall be members of the retirement system as a condition of employment without the necessity of any further amendment to this chapter to include specifically such employees as members of the retirement system. The employers of such employees shall have the same duties and obligations that are applicable to other employers under the retirement system. The employees of new state agencies shall be subject to the provisions of Code Section 47-2-334, except that if a member of the retirement system becomes an employee of a new state agency without any break in service, the member shall retain the same status which the member possessed at the time of becoming an employee of the new state agency.

If the law which establishes or activates a new state agency prohibits officers or employees of the new state agency from being members of the retirement system or limits membership to specified officers or employees of the new state agency, then the provisions of such law shall control over the provisions of subsection (b) of this Code section.

As used in this subsection, the term:

“Corporation” means the Georgia Lottery Corporation created by Code Section 50-27-4.

“Section 401(k) plan” means the deferred compensation plan offered by the state for public employees pursuant to Section 401(k) of the federal Internal Revenue Code on July 1, 1998, as now or subsequently amended.

“Termination date” means the earlier of:

The date on which the corporation receives a favorable ruling from the federal Internal Revenue Service as to the corporation’s participation in the Section 401(k) plan; or

The date on which the corporation establishes a tax qualified retirement plan for its officers and employees.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (c) of this Code section, no person employed as an officer or employee of the corporation on or after the termination date shall be a member of this retirement system. Any member who on the termination date is a member of this retirement system may make an irrevocable election to retain membership in this retirement system by notifying the board of trustees in writing not later than 60 days following the termination date. Any person who so elects to remain a member of this retirement system shall not be eligible to participate in any tax qualified retirement plan offered by such corporation.

If the corporation participates in the Section 401(k) plan, it shall not be authorized to maintain for its officers and employees any tax qualified retirement plan other than the plan qualified under Section 457 of the federal Internal Revenue Code on July 1, 1998.

The corporation’s participation in either the Section 401(k) plan or any tax qualified retirement plan maintained by the corporation shall be subject to the following conditions:

The maximum percentage of a participant’s annual salary which the corporation may pay into the plan for or on behalf of the participant shall not exceed 7 1/2 percent; and

Each participant shall have a vested interest in employer contributions in accordance with the schedule in the subaccount of the Section 401(k) plan providing for employer contributions which is in existence on July 1, 1998, as now or hereafter amended.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-2-70.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2176, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 773, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 947, § 15/HB 202.

The 2009 amendment,

effective May 11, 2009, added the proviso at the end of paragraph (a)(1).

47-2-71.
Membership in Employees’ Social Security Coverage Group.

Any other provisions of law to the contrary notwithstanding, and pursuant to Article VII, Section III, Paragraph I and Article III, Section X of the Constitution of Georgia and Chapter 18 of this title, there is established as of July 1, 1956, Division A of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia as a separate coverage group to be specifically known as the “Employees’ Social Security Coverage Group.”

Any person who joins the retirement system as a contributing member on or after the execution date of the contract extending social security coverage shall become a member of Division A.

The retirement allowance of any member of Division A who retires under this chapter and accepts employment from any state department or any agency which is supported in whole or in part by state funds, regardless of the source of such funds, shall be suspended during such time of his or her employment. If he or she is employed in a department subject to this chapter, he or she shall again become a member of Division A but shall contribute only the required social security tax. Upon separation of such member from state employment for any cause, all rights shall be vested in such member the same as if he or she had continued under his or her option to retire.

Any other provisions of law to the contrary notwithstanding, any required employee tax for social security coverage not otherwise retained by employer fiscal officers shall be deducted from each Division A member’s individual annuity savings account by the retirement system for payment of such required tax. If the member’s annuity savings account is insufficient to cover the required amount of employee tax, it shall be the duty of the fiscal officer of his or her employer to deduct from the current salary of the member such amounts as are necessary for payment of the employee tax. For those members of Division A covered for social security, it shall be the duty of the fiscal officers of the various employers to retain from each of the 5 1/2 percent employee-7 1/2 percent employer contributions for retirement system purposes, 2 percent of the member’s first $4,200.00 annual wages, such amount to apply toward the employee-employer tax required under the Social Security Act. Any additional rate of employee-employer tax for social security shall result in a corresponding increase in the amount of tax payable by the employee and employer. All employee-employer taxes required under the Social Security Act after December 31, 1956, shall be retained by the fiscal officers of the various employers and reported to the board of trustees in accordance with rules and regulations established by the board of trustees. In order to facilitate the making of deductions and to simplify the reporting thereof for those members of Division A covered for social security, the board of trustees shall adopt such tables of employer and employee contributions as will result in uniform monthly contributions to the retirement system throughout the year. Such tables as adopted by the board of trustees shall not be placed in effect prior to January 1, 1963.

Any member of Division A who has reached age 65 may, upon written application to and approval by the board of trustees, discontinue contributions which provide retirement benefits under this chapter. However, the employee tax provided under the Social Security Act shall be paid by the member.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 54, § 6; Ga. L. 1957, p. 283, §§ 8, 9; Ga. L. 1959, p. 107, § 7; Ga. L. 1962, p. 54, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1967, p. 751, § 9; Ga. L. 1973, p. 706, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 63; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 8/SB 436.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, rewrote this Code section.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

47-2-72.
Procedure for electing not to become a member.

Any other provision of this article to the contrary notwithstanding, any person who first becomes an employee of an employer at age 60 or later may elect not to become a member of this retirement system. Such election shall be made in writing to the board within 30 days of first becoming an employee of an employer; otherwise, the person shall become a member of this retirement system. The election provided for in this subsection shall be irrevocable.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-2-72

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 171, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 9/SB 436.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, deleted the former subsection (a) designation and deleted former subsection (b), which read: “Any active member of this retirement system on July 1, 1998, who was age 60 or older when he or she first became a member of this retirement system may elect to withdraw his or her membership and receive the total of his or her employee contributions with regular interest thereon. Such election shall be made in writing to the board not later than August 1, 1998; otherwise, the member shall remain a member of this retirement system. The election provided for in this subsection shall be irrevocable.”

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

47-2-73.
Election of retirement system by members of Georgia Judicial Retirement System; effect of subsequent legislation.

Any provision of this chapter or Chapter 23 of this title to the contrary notwithstanding, any member of the Georgia Judicial Retirement System who is vested for a normal retirement benefit and who without a break in service becomes the head of a state department or agency or who is appointed by the Governor to a full-time salaried position on a state board or commission may make a one time irrevocable election to remain a member of the Georgia Judicial Retirement System or to become a member of this retirement system.

If a person subject to this subsection elects to remain a member of the Georgia Judicial Retirement System, the employer and employee shall make all contributions to such retirement system and perform such other acts as are required by law or regulation.

This subsection shall be applicable to each person who was a member of the Georgia Judicial Retirement System on July 1, 2000, and to any person who becomes a member after that date. Any person eligible to make the election provided for in this subsection shall do so in writing to the board of trustees of this retirement system and the Board of Trustees of the Georgia Judicial Retirement System not later than September 30, 2000, or within 60 days after the date he or she became subject to this Code section. Once made, the election is irrevocable.

Any person subject to this subsection who elects to become a member of this retirement system may have accumulated contributions under the Georgia Judicial Retirement System transferred to this retirement system. The Board of Trustees of the Georgia Judicial Retirement System shall pay to the board of trustees of this retirement system all employer and employee contributions made by or on behalf of the member, together with regular interest. The member shall be granted only so much creditable service as such amount will warrant without creating any accrued actuarial unfunded liability as to this retirement system; provided, however, that such service credits shall not be used in determining the qualifications of a member for benefits other than vested rights or disability, death, or normal service retirement allowances.

The provisions of this Code section shall not become a part of the employment contract and shall be subject to subsequent legislation; provided, however, that no person who has made the election provided by this Code section shall be affected by any subsequent legislation.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-2-73

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1693, § 1.